Tennessee, session 114, SB2548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-19-106, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) A physician assistant is authorized to delegate tasks to a certified medical
assistant, as described in § 68-11-244, as long as the physician assistant is in
collaboration with a licensed physician, pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 1042 of the Public Acts of 2024 is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection in SECTION 2:
(i) A physician assistant is authorized to delegate tasks to a certified medical
assistant, as described in § 68-11-244, pursuant to a protocol or collaborative agreement
with a collaborating physician, pursuant to this section.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(a)(2), is amended by
adding ", physician assistant," immediately after "physician" wherever it appears.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(e)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) Be certified or registered by a recognized certifying body, which includes the
following:
(A) American Medical Technologists (AMT);
(B) American Association of Medical Assistants (AMMA);
(C) National Center for Competency Testing (NCCT);
SB2548
011565
- 1 -

(D) National Healthcareer Association (NHA); or
(E) National Association for Health Professionals (NAHP).
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(g), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(g) An ambulatory outpatient clinic is responsible for training and verifying the
competency of a certified medical assistant pursuant to this section, which includes
ensuring additional training and validation to administer medications, if necessary.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(i)(1)(A), is amended by
adding ", physician assistant," immediately after "nurse".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(i)(1)(D), is amended by
adding ", physician assistant," immediately after "physician" wherever it appears.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(i)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision.
(E)
(i) A delegation of medication administration or other tasks to a certified
medical assistant from a physician assistant must be carried out in accordance
with the rules adopted by the board of physician's assistants.
(ii) The board of physician's assistants is authorized to promulgate rules
related to the administration of vaccines and other tasks that may be delegated
by a physician assistant to certified medical assistants under this section. The
rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(i)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2)
- 2 - 011565

(A) In exercising the authority to administer medications pursuant to a
physician's, physician assistant's, or licensed nurse's delegation, a certified
medical assistant may administer or prepare only those medications that have
been ordered by an authorized healthcare provider and are in either:
(i) A single dose, appropriately labelled, ready-to-administer
packaging; or
(ii) A multi-dose, appropriately labelled packaging for which a
specific dose is ordered and a dose calculation is not required by the
certified medical assistant.
(B) The medications that a certified medical assistant may administer or
prepare, as described in subdivision (i)(2)(A), include the following categories:
(i) Intramuscular, intradermal, or subcutaneous medications;
(ii) Vaccines;
(iii) Oral, sublingual, and buccal medications;
(iv) Topical medications;
(v) Irrigants;
(vi) Optic medications, excluding injectables;
(vii) Metered hand-held inhalants;
(viii) Unit dose nebulizers;
(ix) Octic medications, excluding injectables;
(x) Nasal medications, excluding injectables;
(xi) Rectal medications;
(xii) Medications prepared by the certified medical assistant for
administration by the provider;
(xiii) Urethral, transurethral, or intravesicular medications;
- 3 - 011565

(xiv) Vaginal medications ,excluding injectables; and
(xv) Anesthetic agents, limited to the following:
(a) Transdermal;
(b) Subcutaneous, not to exceed provider's ordered dose
and limited to trunk and extremities, excluding the digits or
genitals; or
(c) Transmucosal.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(i)(3), is amended by
adding ", physician assistant," immediately after "by a physician".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(i)(3), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
A physician assistant shall not delegate any patient care activity that requires the
exercise of physician assistant's judgment in assessing, planning, or altering care based
on the needs of the individual patient.
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(j)(8), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(j), is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
( ) Inhaled gases for anesthesia;
( ) Anesthetic agents, not including the agents described in subdivision
(i)(2)(B)(xv);
( ) Aesthetic medications, including botulinum toxin, fillers, or chemical peels;
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-244(j), is amended by adding
", physician assistant," immediately after "A physician" and by adding ", physician assistant,"
immediately after "licensed nurse".
- 4 - 011565

SECTION 15. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 011565